Hawaii statutes.
[§634-21.5] Service of process within a
condominium, cooperative housing, or planned community. (a) Each board of
directors of an association of apartment owners governed by chapter 514A or
514B, cooperative housing corporation governed by chapter 421I, and planned
community association governed by chapter 421J shall establish, if entry to the
property is inaccessible to the general public, a policy to provide reasonable
access as specified in subsection (b) to the building or community to persons
authorized to serve civil process for the purpose of serving any summons,
subpoena, notice, or order on a person who is identified by the document being
served as residing or present in the condominium, cooperative housing project,
or planned community.

(b) The policy established pursuant to
subsection (a) shall:

(1) Subject to any conditions as may be specified in
accordance with paragraph (4), allow a person authorized to serve civil process
to access common areas adjacent to a principal entry to the residence specified
in accordance with paragraph (2) for the sole purpose of attempting to effect
service of process;

(2) Require that a person authorized to serve civil
process present clear personal identification and evidence that the person is
authorized to serve process, including documentation clearly indicating the
precise name and address, and if applicable, a unit number, of the person
residing or present on the property to be served;

(3) Allow for denial of access to the person
authorized to serve civil process if the person is unable to produce clear and
credible identification and documentation as required in paragraph (2);

(4) Set forth conditions of time and manner
according to which a person authorized to serve civil process may enter and
remain in the building or community, and allow a person designated in
accordance with paragraph (5) to compel a person authorized to serve civil
process, who has been allowed access to the building or community but who has
not acted in accordance with the conditions, to leave the building or community
immediately; and

(5) Designate an individual, by title or position,
such as a resident manager, a building manager who is located in or reasonably
near the building or community, or another person who is generally available to
respond to a request for access during normal business hours in a timely
manner, and at least one alternate individual if the primary designee is
unavailable, to respond to a request for access by a person authorized to serve
civil process.

(c) An association of apartment owners
governed by chapter 514A or 514B, a cooperative housing corporation governed by
chapter 421I, or a planned community association governed by chapter 421J shall
not be liable to:

(1) Any person if, after access is allowed to the
building or community in accordance with this chapter, service of civil process
is not actually effected for whatever reason; and

(2) A person upon whom service of process is actually
effected in accordance with this chapter.

(d) As of January 1, 2010, each board of
directors of an association of apartment owners of a condominium shall identify
the designees specified in subsection (b)(5) in its biennial registration. A
cooperative housing corporation or planned community association shall make a
printed copy of the policy required by this chapter available at all times at
the principal point of entry to the building or community.

[(e)] The department of commerce and consumer
affairs shall adopt or amend forms and shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
to implement this [section]. [L 2009, c 158, §§5, 6, 8; am L 2011, c 65, §1]

Revision Note

L 2009, c 158, §6 was codified to this section pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next